Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
RODENT CONTROL

35-7-101. Legislative declaration.

Whereas, in many large areas of this state certain destructive rodent pests, such as jackrabbits, prairie dogs, ground squirrels, pocket gophers, and rats, have become so numerous and such a grave and immediate menace to the agricultural, horticultural, and livestock industries of the state that large numbers of the inhabitants engaged in such industries in the localities so infested are in great and imminent danger of being impoverished and reduced to want by the destruction of their crops; and, whereas, the situation is so serious and the emergency so urgent that public necessity demands that prompt, efficacious, and summary action be taken under the police power of the state to control, suppress, and eradicate the rodents in the areas infested by them; now, therefore, it is declared that in all fields, orchards, places, localities, and areas in the state infested with any such rodents in sufficient numbers as to materially injure agricultural or horticultural crops therein, such infestation is a public nuisance and subject to suppression and abatement as such under the provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 616, § 1.

CSA:

C. 5, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-1.

35-7-102. Agreement with the federal government.

To the end that the situation may be speedily remedied, it is the duty of the department of agriculture, referred to in this part 1 as the "department", to enter into written agreements on behalf of the state with the federal agency in charge of rodent control matters, referred to in this article as the "federal agency", such agreements to define such procedure, in accordance with the provisions of this part 1, as they deem advisable and proper for the purpose of cooperating with the federal agency in the control and eradication within this state of the rodent pests mentioned in section 35-7-101.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 617, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 45.

L. 39:

p. 210, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-2.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1030, § 58, effective June 1.

35-7-103. Rodent pest control fund - creation.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this part 1, there is hereby created the rodent pest control fund. To insure continuity of contractual relations with the federal agency, said fund shall be permanent, and the same, together with all appropriations and all reimbursements or accretions thereto, from whatever source derived, is appropriated to carry out the purposes of this part 1.

All disbursements from the fund shall be by warrants drawn by the controller upon itemized vouchers certified by the federal agency as to correctness and approved by the department which shall approve the vouchers for all lawful expenses incurred in carrying out the purposes of this part 1 and in accordance with the terms of any cooperative agreements entered into by the department with the federal agency.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 617, § 3.

L. 31:

p. 708, § 1.

CSA:

C. 5, § 46.

L. 39:

p. 210, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1030, § 59, effective June 1.

35-7-104. Cooperative agreements.

Operations under the provisions of this part 1 for the control and eradication of rodent pests shall be in accordance with the approved procedure of the federal agency and in accordance with the terms of such agreements as shall be entered into by the department and the federal agency. To enable the department to carry out any such agreement or to perform the duties devolved upon the department in carrying out the purpose of this part 1, the department is authorized to enlist and pay the necessary expenses of volunteer agents and to employ and pay the salary and necessary expenses of such other agents as may be required to act in their behalf. To further enlarge and accelerate operation for the control of such rodent pests, the department, acting in conjunction with the federal agency, may enter into cooperative agreements with boards of county commissioners or with associations, corporations, or individuals owning land subject to or menaced by such infestations.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 618, § 4.

CSA:

C. 5, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1030, § 60, effective June 1.

35-7-105. Boundaries of infested areas defined.

For the purpose of carrying out this part 1, the respective boards of county commissioners have the power to define the boundaries of such rodent-infested areas within their jurisdictions and to put into operation such cooperative agreements for such areas in the manner as in their discretion may be deemed advisable.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 709, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-5.

35-7-106. Government lands.

On lands which are a part of any national forest, Indian reservation, or other national reserve or public domain of the United States, or of any state reservation, or of any unoccupied or leased state lands, the control of such rodent pests shall be carried on so far as possible at the expense of the federal government on federal lands and at the expense of the state government on unoccupied or leased state lands with such cooperation with occupants, lessees, licensees, or adjacent landowners as may be available.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 618, § 5.

CSA:

C. 5, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-6.

35-7-107. Land under contract of purchase.

On state land sold under contract of purchase whereunder patent has not been issued, the control shall be prosecuted, so far as possible, on a cooperative basis, pursuant to such terms as may be agreed upon with the contract holder.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 619, § 6.

CSA:

C. 5, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-7.

35-7-108. Private lands.

Upon privately owned lands, the control of rodent pests under this part 1 shall, so far as possible, be based on voluntary cooperation of owners, lessees, or occupants. If a private landowner enters into a cooperative agreement with the county pursuant to which the county agrees to control rodent pests on the landowner's real property, the private landowner shall reimburse the county for actual expenses incurred by the county in connection with such rodent pests control operations.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 619, § 7.

CSA:

C. 5, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-8.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1087), ch. 19, p. 48, § 1, effective August 10.

35-7-109. Agreements with landowners.

Owners of private lands may arrange, under written cooperative agreements with the department and the federal agency in charge of operations, for the control and eradication of rodent pests on their lands.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 619, § 8.

CSA:

C. 5, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-9.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1030, § 61, effective June 1.

35-7-110. State reimbursed for actual cost.

All poisons or other materials for such control furnished by the state to such cooperators shall be supplied at actual cost, and the state shall be reimbursed by such cooperators, landowners, lessees, or contract holders for the actual cost of materials and labor, other than supervision, expended by the state in such treatment under cooperative agreements with them. Such reimbursement shall be made by each owner, lessee, or contract holder in the proportion that the number of acres of land treated for him or her bears to the total acreage treated in the area designated for treatment or according to such equitable proportion or plan as shall be provided for in the agreement. Any such agreement shall require full reimbursement to be made to the state within thirty days after presentation by the department, or its agents, of an itemized account therefor.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 619, § 9.

CSA:

C. 5, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-10.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1087), ch. 19, p. 48, § 2, effective August 10.

35-7-111. County to appropriate funds.

It is the duty of boards of county commissioners in all counties where any such infestation exists or is imminent to appropriate from the general fund such money as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 1 within their respective counties. In counties where pest control districts have been created, or are about to be created, it is the duty of the board of county commissioners to appropriate from the county general fund such money as shall be necessary to establish and maintain a fund for the payment of all accounts charged or chargeable against them under the terms of this part 1.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 566, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 54.

L. 51:

p. 296, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-11.

35-7-112. Eradication contracts required - procedure without contracts.

In case a majority of resident landowners in a prescribed district have signed a cooperative agreement to destroy rodents on their lands, public notice may be given by publication by the boards of county commissioners wherein the lands are located at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the counties affected to the effect that lands within the boundaries of such prescribed area, lying in one or more counties, are infested by said pests, or some kind thereof, in such numbers that in the opinion of the said department the same are liable to materially injure and imperil agricultural or horticultural crops within such area, and that such lands are about to be treated, under the provisions of this part 1, for the control and eradication of the pests. If, within thirty days after the publication of such notice, any owner of lands infested by the pests within the prescribed area fails to destroy the same, or to enter into a cooperative agreement for their control or eradication, then, at the time operations are instituted on such lands, it is the duty of the department, or its agents, to enter upon the lands and to destroy the pests thereon at the expense of the owner of such lands.

If the owner, after ten days' written notice to him in person or by mail to his last known post office address, fails, neglects, or refuses to reimburse the department, or its agents, in the amount of such expenses, the department shall certify an itemized statement thereof, together with a description of such lands sufficient to identify the same to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the same is situated. Thereupon, such an account shall be audited, allowed, and paid in like manner as provided in section 35-7-110. Public notices in this section provided for shall designate as accurately as may be the boundaries of the area to be treated; shall make specific reference to this statute and shall call upon all owners, known or unknown, of lands within the prescribed area to proceed at once to destroy the pests mentioned in such notice or to enter into cooperative agreements for their control or eradication; and shall designate reasonable times and places within or near such area where and when the federal agency, or other agents, and the department, or its agents, will be present for the purpose of entering into such cooperative agreements and proceeding with their execution.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 620, § 11.

L. 31:

p. 709, § 3.

CSA:

C. 5, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-12.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1031, § 62, effective June 1.

35-7-113. Itemized accounts.

The department shall keep itemized accounts of the actual expenses of materials and labor in connection with the control and eradication of rodent pests, whether such work is done under cooperative agreements with owners, lessees, or contract holders or otherwise.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 622, § 12.

CSA:

C. 5, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-13.

35-7-114. Charges against landowner - lien rights.

Whenever any county has been required to pay any expense charged against any landowners, under a cooperative agreement or otherwise, on account of such pest control operations conducted upon or for the benefit of his or her lands, such county shall have a lien upon such lands for the amount so paid or for such lesser amount as such landowner shall be adjudged to pay after a hearing before the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 622, § 13.

CSA:

C. 5, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-14.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1087), ch. 19, p. 49, § 3, effective August 10.

35-7-115. Enforcing collection - hearing.

Upon payment by any county of any such bill of expenses so charged against any landowner, lessee, or contract holder, the board of county commissioners shall make demand and notice in writing, upon such landowner, lessee, or contract holder, in person or by mail addressed to him or her at his or her last known place of residence twenty days prior to the published meeting date, for reimbursement to the county in the amount of such expenses. Such written notice shall inform such person that he or she may appear before the board on the published meeting date and be heard as to the amount and accuracy of the claim. If such claim, as originally demanded by the board or as adjusted upon the hearing, is not paid, then, in the case of a private landowner, the board of county commissioners shall certify the claim to the county assessor who shall add the amount thereof to any taxes due or to become due upon his or her lands, and said lands shall be sold for the satisfaction thereof at the same time and in the same manner as is provided by law for the sale of real estate for delinquent taxes. In cases where such accounts are payable by a lessee or contract holder, suit may be maintained in behalf of the county in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of such accounts and costs of suit. All such accounts when collected by the county shall be paid into the general fund thereof or into the fund used by the county to meet its obligations under this part 1.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 711, § 4.

CSA:

C. 5, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-15.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1087), ch. 19, p. 49, § 4, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the sale of real estate for delinquent taxes, see article 11 of title 39.

35-7-116. Collections paid to treasurer.

All reimbursements to the state, whether made by individuals, counties, or other cooperators pursuant to this part 1, shall be turned over to the state treasurer and by him credited to the rodent pest control fund referred to in section 35-7-103.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 623, § 15.

CSA:

C. 5, § 59.

L. 39:

p. 211, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-16.

35-7-117. Record of poison purchased.

The department, when acting in cooperation with the federal agency in rodent control operations through its officers, members, or authorized agents, may purchase and sell to landowners, lessees, contract holders, boards of county commissioners, and other cooperators strychnine and other poisons and supplies for rodent control. The department or its agents shall make and keep a record of all such sales made by showing the name and address of purchaser, date of purchase, and kind and amount of poison or rodent supplies purchased.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 623, § 16.

CSA:

C. 5, § 60.

L. 39:

p. 211, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 6-7-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-7-17.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1031, § 63, effective June 1.